test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-unwhtuma70_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - unõhtuma: # Verb (70) unõhtuma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     unõhtuma+V+Inf/mA: [unõhtuma, unõhuma]
     unõhtuma+V+Inf: [unõhtudaq, unõhudaq]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+PrfPrc: [unõhtunuq, unõhunuq]
     unõhtuma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [unõhtut, unõhut]

     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [unõhtu, unõhu]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [unõhtut, unõhtudõq, unõhut, unõhudõq]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [unõhtus, unõhus]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [unõhtumiq, unõhumiq]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [unõhtutiq, unõhutiq]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [unõhtusõq, unõhusõq]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: [unõhtu, unõhu]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [unõhtu, unõhu]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [unõhtut, unõhtuq, unõhtudõq, unõhut, unõhuq, unõhudõq]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [unõhtu, unõhu]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [unõhtumiq, unõhumiq]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [unõhtutiq, unõhutiq]
     unõhtuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [unõhtuq, unõhtuvaq, unõhuq, unõhuvaq]

     unõhtuma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [unõhtuda, unõhuda]
     unõhtuma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [unõhtudas, unõhudas]

     unõhtuma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [unõhtuv, unõhuv]

     unõhtuma+V+Jus: [unõhtuguq, unõhuguq]
